Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1495
Individuals appointed to office; statement of financial interests; filing; time; where; public information.

An individual appointed to an office specified in section 49-1493 shall, before assuming duties, file a statement for the preceding calendar year with the commission. When confirmation is required, the individual shall file a statement of financial interests for the preceding calendar year with the commission prior to the confirmation hearing or prior to assuming his or her duties, whichever comes first.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 95;

Laws 1989, LB 815, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 534, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 11;

Laws 2003, LB 349, § 2.